Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CRITICAL MATERIALS STUDY.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to study critical materials in the waste stream. For purposes of this section, "critical materials" means materials on the final 2023 Critical Materials List published by the United States Secretary of Energy in the Federal Register on August 4, 2023, as amended, as required under section 7002 of the Energy Act of 2020. By October 1, 2028, the commissioner must submit the results of the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over environment policy and finance. The study must include at least: new text end new text begin (1) an estimate of the type and volume of products containing critical materials that enter Minnesota's economy; new text end new text begin (2) the amount of critical materials recovered from products through recycling or by using technological processes to extract and remove critical materials from waste streams with the goal of reconstituting them in a pure form that can be reused; and new text end new text begin (3) an estimate of the volume of products containing critical materials present in the waste stream in the state. new text end